Maryland, session 2026, SB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Public Schools Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics
(STEM) and Robotics Program Task Force.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(4) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) three representatives from local school systems, appointed by the State
Superintendent of Schools or the State Superintendent’s designee; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0990*

SENATE BILL 990
(7) three representatives of nonprofit organizations that provide STEM
and robotics services in the State, appointed by the Governor.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The State Department of Education shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) collect information regarding existing STEM and robotics programs in
public schools in the State and in other states, including:
(i) a description of each program;
(ii) requirements for the administration of each program;
(iii) the funding amount and source of funding for each program; and
(iv) the impact on revenues and expenditures in the State and other
applicable states;
(2) study:
(i) the feasibility of implementing competitive STEM and robotics
programs in public schools throughout the State; and
(ii) approaches and resources needed to implement competitive
STEM and robotics programs in public schools throughout the State; and
(3) make recommendations on establishing competitive robotics programs
as varsity sports in every public high school throughout the State.
(g) On or before December 15, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate Committee
on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House Appropriations Committee, the
House Ways and Means Committee, and the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.

SENATE BILL 990 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.